Tennessee, session 114, SB2152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-31-102(12)(A), is amended by
deleting "digging, ditching" and substituting "digging, dredging, ditching".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-31-102, is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) "Digital locating" means the application of a visual indicator to digital imagery
or an electronic map to indicate the location of underground utilities;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-31-106(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "fifteen (15) calendar days" and substituting "twenty (20) calendar days", and by
deleting "fifteenth calendar day" and substituting "twentieth calendar day".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-31-106(b), is amended by
deleting subdivisions (1), (2), (3), and (4), and by deleting "electric white lining, unless:" and
substituting:
electric white lining, unless the person responsible for the excavation or demolition and
all operators with underground facilities in the proposed area of excavation have had a
meeting prior to the beginning of the excavation or demolition for the exchange of
information on the location of the proposed excavation or demolition.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-31-106(e), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
SB2152
012014
- 1 -

(3) The use of vacuum excavation by or on behalf of a member operator for
locating or protecting the member operator's underground facilities once notified in
accordance with the requirements of this section.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-31-118(b)(1)(B), is amended by
deleting "area, or other facility records" and substituting "area, digital locating, or other facility
records".
SECTION 7. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012014